Hawaii, session 2026, GM1312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature acknowledges that Hawaii's
housing shortage is exacerbated when housing developed or
supported through public approvals subsequently exits the pool
of housing inventory available to residents. Furthermore, the
legislature recognizes that affordability restrictions limited
by time may result in units being sold or rented without
consideration of local residency or occupancy, thereby
undermining the long-term objectives of housing programs.
The legislature further finds that perpetual deed
restrictions can help preserve residential housing for future
generations by ensuring that units are sold exclusively to
qualified residents and that occupancy is limited to individuals
domiciled within the State. These restrictions are intended to
promote local ownership, encourage resident occupancy, and
reduce vacant investment holdings and transient usage.
2026-3192 HB1740 GDI HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Additionally, the legislature notes that the Hawaii housing
finance and development corporation requires qualified residents
to demonstrate financial viability to purchase or the ability to
pay rent for units in certain housing projects. However,
lenders and landlords already conduct necessary underwriting and
screening, and duplicative reviews by the corporation may cause
unwarranted delays and administrative burden.
The legislature also recognizes that certain ownership­
based criteria in the existing definition of qualified resident
may inadvertently limit mobility for local households and
disrupt typical progression through the housing market, such as
when growing families need to move to larger units.
Deed-restricted units should be permitted to be rented on a
long-term basis and not be subject to perpetual owner-occupancy
requirements following an initial occupancy period, as long as
residency and occupancy standards remain enforced and transient
use is prohibited.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to strengthen the
long-term public benefit of Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation-approved housing projects by:
2026-3192 HB1740 CDl HMSO
■iiniiiiiniiiin

Page 3 1740
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(1) Removing certain financial screening and ownership
qualifications for purchasers of a unit in a
corporation-approved housing project;
(2) Limiting a qualified resident from owning a majority
interest in no more than one property suitable for
dwelling purposes, but requiring the disposal of such
property within two years; and
(3) Amending exemptions from statutes, ordinances, charter
provisions, and rules for certain housing projects
developed by the corporation that satisfy certain
conditions, including requirements related to
employment, owner-occupancy, and deed restrictions.
SECTION 2. Section 201H-32, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "qualified resident" to
read as follows:
""Qualified resident" means a person who:
(1) Is a citizen of the United States or a resident alien;
(2) Is at least eighteen years of age;
(3) Is domiciled in the State and physically resides in
the dwelling unit purchased or rented under this
chapter;
2026-3192 HB1740 CDl HMSO

liininnniiinuffiiiii

Page 4 H.B. NO.
-0%
C.D. 1
[-(-4-)- the casG of—the pugc-hasc of real property in—fee
Gimple or Icaoeholdy—ha-s—a—o^^o-s-s—in-eoffte—s-trf#ire-±-en-t—to
qualify-for the loan to finance the purohaoo;—or in
the case of a rental,—demonstratco an ability to pay
rent as—determ-ined by the corporation—and meets any
addit-ional cr-ib-eria catabliohod by the--eorporation for
the respective—rental housing development for which
the applicant is applying;—and
-(-5-)- Meate-s—the following qualificafe-ions ;
-(A)- As—a—peraon—who—aibhen-fey—fehe-^enson-i-s—soif-z—ar
together with spouse or household member,—does
nob—awn—a—wayority^Anbaras-fe-an-^ae—sirnpio—on
leasehold lands suitable for dwcl-ling purposes or
a majority interest in lands under any trust
agreement—or other f-iducia-ry arrangement in which
another -parson—hal-ds the legal title to-the land;
—\
UllxJ.
-(A)- Is a person whose spouse-or- household member docs
nob—awn—a—maj-ariby—inbora&b—bn—bae—sampio—ar
leasehold landsauitablc fordwelling purposesar
mora-than—a- majority interest in lands under any
2026-3192 HB1740 GDI HMSO

■iiiHiiiiiiniiMiiin

Page 5 H.B. NO.
' %
h d
C.D. 1
trust agroGmcnt or other fiduciary arrangement in
which another person -holds the legal title to the
land,—e-xeefit when husband and wife arc—Living
apart under a decree of sepa-ration from bod and
feear^d-^rsaued-^y-^fehe-^afftiLy—ta
saetieft—7-1-^
provided that for]
(4) Owns a majority interest in no more than one property
suitable for dwelling purposes; provided that the
property shall be disposed of within two years of
owning a housing unit developed under this chapter;
arid
(5) In the case of purchasers of market-priced units in an
economically integrated housing project[7—the term
"qualified resident" means a person who io]2.
(A) I_s a citizen of the United States or a resident
alien; [ie]
(B) Is domiciled in the State and shall physically
reside in the dwelling unit purchased; [is-]
Is at least eighteen years of age; and [meets-]
2026-3192 HB1740 GDI HMSO

iiiiiiHiiiiiininiiiiiiii

Page 6
H.B. NO. -o-
C.D. 1
(D) Meets other qualifications as determined by the
developer."
SECTION 3. Section 201H-38, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) The corporation may develop on behalf of the State or
with an eligible developer, or may assist under a government
assistance program in the development of, housing projects that
shall be exempt from all statutes, charter provisions,
ordinances, and rules of any government agency relating to
planning, zoning, construction standards for subdivisions,
development and improvement of land, and the construction of
dwelling units thereon; provided that:
(1) The housing projects meet the following conditions:
(A) The corporation finds the housing project is
consistent with the purpose and intent of this
chapter, meets minimum requirements of health and
safety, and provides the county an opportunity to
comment;
(B) The development of the proposed housing project
does not contravene any safety standards,
tariffs, or rates and fees approved by the public
2026-3192 HB1740 CDl HMSO


Page 7
H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
utilities commission for public utilities or of
the various boards of water supply authorized
under chapter 54;
(C) The legislative body of the county in which the
housing project is to be situated has approved
the project with or without modifications:
(i) The legislative body shall approve, approve
with modification, or disapprove the project
by resolution within forty-five days after
the corporation has submitted the
preliminary plans and specifications for the
project to the legislative body; provided
further that the legislative body shall not
impose stricter conditions, impose stricter
median income requirements, or reduce fee
waivers that will increase the cost of the
project beyond those approved by the
corporation. If, on the forty-sixth day, a
project is not disapproved, it shall be
deemed approved by the legislative body;
2026-3192 HB1740 CDl HMSO 7
iiioiHiiiiiiiimiiw

Pages H■ ■ .B. Nik ■ O. 1740
HD2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(ii) No action shall be prosecuted or maintained
against any county, its officials, or
employees on account of actions taken by
them in reviewing, approving, modifying, or
disapproving the plans and specifications;
and
(iii) The final plans and specifications for the
project shall be deemed approved by the
legislative body if the final plans and
specifications do not substantially deviate
from the preliminary plans and
specifications. The final plans and
specifications for the project shall
constitute the zoning, building,
construction, and subdivision standards for
that project. For the purposes of sections
501-85 and 502-17, the executive director of
the corporation or the responsible county
official may certify maps and plans of lands
connected with the project as having
complied with applicable laws and ordinances
2026-3192 HB1740 CDl HMSO

Page 9 1740
H.B. NO
H.D.2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
relating to consolidation and subdivision of
lands, and the maps and plans shall be
accepted for registration or recordation by
the land court and registrar; and
(D) The land use commission has approved, approved
with modification, or disapproved a boundary
change within forty-five days after the
corporation has submitted a petition to the
commission as provided in section 205-4. If, on
the forty-sixth day, the petition is not
disapproved, it shall be deemed approved by the
commission; or
(2) The housing projects:
(A) Meet the conditions of paragraph (1) [y-] , except
for any requirements that impose income
requirements for a housing project; and
[-(©)- Bo- not impose-'-strictcr income rcquircmcnto than
thooG adopted or cotablishcd by the State;—and
For the lifetime of the project,—require that one
hundred per cent of the units in the project be
oxclusivoly for qualified residents.]
2026-3192 HB1740 CDl HMSO

iiiiiwniiiiiiniiiig

Page 10
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(B) Notwithstanding the ten-year owner-occupancy
requirement in sections 201H-47 and 201H-49,
ensure that no less than eighty per cent of the
units are sold to qualified residents and shall
remain owner-occupied for a minimum of five years
following the initial sale of the unit; provided
that upon the initial sale, each unit in the
project shall be subject to a perpetual deed
restriction requiring that:
(i) The unit is at all times occupied by a
person domiciled in the State, except in
cases of hardship as provided in section
201H-49; provided that any disability-
related temporary absence from the unit,
including an absence due to hospitalization,
inpatient rehabilitation, or a medically-
necessary care facility stay, shall be a
hardship circumstance under section 201H-49
and shall not be a violation of the deed
restriction;
2026-3192 HB1740 GDI HMSO 10

Page 11 H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
(ii) Any rental of the unit shall be for a
minimum lease term of one year or more; and
(iii) Any sale of the unit shall be to a qualified
resident."
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3192 HB1740 CDl HMSO 11
iiniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiin

1740
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of July , 2026

HB No. 1740, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1740, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 1,2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
29-26